hunspell/kpv/komi.aff
FLAG long
SFX U9 Y 3185 # локны 1
SFX U9 ны 0/G3G4 .
SFX U9 ны та/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тад/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны там/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тамӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тамӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тан/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тана/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаа/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаад/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаам/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаанӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танааныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танааным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танааныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаас/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танад/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаджыкӧсь .
SFX U9 ны танаджыкыс .
SFX U9 ны танаджыка .
SFX U9 ны танаджыкӧн .
SFX U9 ны танакӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танала/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньӧдз/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньӧдзныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньӧдзным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньӧдзныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньӧдзыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньӧдзым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньӧдзыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньӧдныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньӧдным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньӧдныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньӧдыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньӧдым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньӧдыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньсьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньсьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньсьыныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньсьыным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньсьыныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньсьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньсяньныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньсяньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньсяньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньсяньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньсяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньтіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньтіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньтіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньтіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньтіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньтіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньын/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаньысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаняд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаням/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаняныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаняным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаняныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналаняс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны таналысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танам/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танамоз/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананад/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананам/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танананыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танананым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танананыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананас/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананог/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананогӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананыдкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананыдла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананыдлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананыдлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананыдлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананыдлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананымкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананымла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананымлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананымлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананымлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананымлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананымӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананыскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананыслань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананыслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананыслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны тананыслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧ/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧдз/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧдзныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧдзным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧдзныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧдзыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧдзым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧдзыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧдныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧдным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧдныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧдыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧдым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧдыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧйкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧйла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧйлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧйланьсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧйлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧйлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧйлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧйся/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧйсянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧйтӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаӧсь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танас/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасьыныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасьыным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасьыныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танася/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасянь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасяньныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасяньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасяньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасяньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасяньым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасяыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танасяыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаті/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танатіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танатіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танатіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танатіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танатіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танатіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танатӧг/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танатӧгныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танатӧгным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танатӧгныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танатӧгыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танатӧгыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаыдкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаыдла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаыдлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаыдлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаыдлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаын/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаыскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаыслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаыслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаыслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясад/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясам/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясанӧй/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясаныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясаным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясаныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясас/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяслань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьӧдзныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьӧдзным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьӧдзныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьӧдзыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьӧдзым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьӧдзыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьӧдныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьӧдным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьӧдныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьӧдыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьӧдым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьӧдыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьсьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьсьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьсьыныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьсьыным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьсьыныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьсьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьсяньныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьсяньным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьсяньныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьсяньыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьсяньыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьтіныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьтіным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьтіныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьтіыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьтіым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьтіыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьыд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьым/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланьыс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланяд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланям/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланяныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланяным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланяныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясланяс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяснад/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяснам/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяснаныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяснаным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяснаныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяснас/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясныд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясныдкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясныдла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясныдлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясныдлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясныдлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясныдлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясным/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяснымкӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяснымла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяснымлань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяснымлӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяснымлы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяснымлысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяснымӧс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясныс/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясныскӧд/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяснысла/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясныслань/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясныслӧн/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясныслы/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаясныслысь/G1G2G3 .
SFX U9 ны танаяснысӧ/G2 .
SFX U9 ны танаяснытӧ/G2 .
